zh-TW: 攝影機安裝位置 (車輛外部): 前 (水箱護罩/保險桿); 前 + 後 (2 鏡頭工具包); 前 + 後 + 側邊 (4 鏡頭工具包); 後 (車牌/保險桿); 車頂/由上往下安裝; 側邊 (左); 側邊 (右); 後照鏡 (一對); 尾門/掀背; 通用/依安裝方式而異; 其他
sv: Kameramonteringsplattor (fordonets utsida): Fram (grill/stötfångare); Fram + bak (2-kameraskit); Fram + bak + sidor (4-kameraskit); Bak (registreringsskylt/stötfångare); Tak/fågelperspektiv; Sida (vänster); Sida (höger); Sidospeglar (par); Baklucka; Universell/varierar beroende på installation; Övrigt
zh-CN: 摄像头安装位置（车辆外部）: 前部（格栅/保险杠）; 前侧 + 后侧（2 摄像头套件）; 前侧 + 后侧 + 两侧（4 摄像头套件）; 后部（车牌/保险杠）; 车顶/自上而下安装座; 侧边（左）; 侧边（右）; 侧视镜（一对）; 尾门/掀背门; 通用/依安装而异; 其他
pl: Lokalizacja mocowania kamery (zewnętrzna część pojazdu): Przód (grill/zderzak); Przód + tył (zestaw 2 kamer); Przód + tył + boki (zestaw 4 kamer); Tył (tablica rejestracyjna/zderzak); Mocowanie na dachu/z góry; Bok (lewa); Bok (prawa); Lusterka boczne (para); Klapa bagażnika; Uniwersalne/w zależności od montażu; Inne
pt-PT: Localização de montagem da câmara (exterior do veículo): Frente (grelha/para-choques); Frente + traseira (kit de 2 câmaras); Frente + traseira + laterais (kit de 4 câmaras); Traseira (matrícula/para-choques); Tejadilho/montagem superior; Lateral (esquerda); Lateral (direita); Espelhos retrovisores (par); Porta da bagageira; Universal/varia consoante a instalação; Outro
hu: Kamera rögzítésének helye (jármű külső részén): Elöl (hűtőrács/lökhárító); Elöl + hátul (2 kamerás készlet); Elöl + hátul + oldalt (4 kamerás készlet); Hátul (rendszámtábla/lökhárító); Tető/felülről lefelé rögzítés; Oldalt (bal); Oldalt (jobb); Oldalsó tükrök (pár); Csomagtérajtó; Univerzális/telepítéstől függő; Egyéb
it: Sede di montaggio della telecamera (esterno del veicolo): Anteriore (griglia/paraurti); Anteriore + posteriore (kit con 2 telecamere); Anteriore + posteriore + lati (kit con 4 telecamere); Posteriore (targa/paraurti); Tetto/montaggio dall'alto; Lato (sinistro); Lato (destro); Specchietti retrovisori (coppia); Portellone/bagagliaio; Universale/varia in base all'installazione; Altro
sk-SK: Miesto montáže kamery (exteriér vozidla): Vpredu (maska/nárazník); Vpredu + vzadu (súprava 2 kamier); Vpredu + vzadu + po stranách (súprava 4 kamier); Vzadu (poznávacia značka/nárazník); Strecha/montáž zhora nadol; Na boku (vľavo); Na boku (vpravo); Bočné zrkadlá (pár); Piate dvere/kufrové dvere; Univerzálne/podľa montáže; Iné
ja: カメラ取り付け位置（車両エクステリア）: フロント (グリル/バンパー); フロント + リア (2カメラキット); フロント + リア + サイド (4カメラキット); リア (ナンバープレート/バンパー); ルーフ/トップダウンマウント; サイド (左); サイド (右); サイドミラー (ペア); テールゲート/ハッチ; ユニバーサル/取り付けにより異なる; その他
ru: Место установки камеры (экстерьер автомобиля): Спереди (решетка / бампер); Спереди + сзади (комплект из 2 камер); Спереди + сзади + по бокам (комплект из 4 камер); Сзади (номерной знак / бампер); На крыше / вид сверху; Сбоку (слева); Сбоку (справа); Боковые зеркала (пара); Задняя дверь / багажник; Универсальное / зависит от установки; Другое
de: Kameramontageort (Fahrzeugaußenbereich): Vorne (Kühlergrill/Stoßstange); Vorne + hinten (2-Kamera-Set); Vorne + hinten + Seiten (4-Kamera-Set); Hinten (Nummernschild/Stoßstange); Dach-/Top-Down-Montage; Seite (links); Seite (rechts); Seitenspiegel (Paar); Heckklappe/Luke; Universal/Variiert je nach Installation; Sonstige
nl: Camera montagelocatie (voertuigexterieur): Voor (grille/bumper); Voor + achter (2-camerakit); Voor + achter + zijkanten (4-camerakit); Achter (kentekenplaat/bumper); Dak/top-down; Zijkant (links); Zijkant (rechts); Zijspiegels (paar); Achterklep; Universeel/varieert per installatie; Overig
lt-LT: Kameros montavimo vieta (transporto priemonės išorė): Priekinė (grotelės / buferis); Priekinė + galinė (2 kamerų rinkinys); Priekinė + galinė + šoninės (4 kamerų rinkinys); Galinė (valstybinis numeris / buferis); Ant stogo / tvirtinama viršuje; Šoninė (kairė); Šoninė (dešinė); Šoniniai veidrodėliai (pora); Bagažinės dangtis; Universali / priklauso nuo montavimo; Kita
en: Camera mounting location (vehicle exterior): Front (grille/bumper); Front + rear (2-camera kit); Front + rear + sides (4-camera kit); Rear (license plate/bumper); Roof/top-down mount; Side (left); Side (right); Side mirrors (pair); Tailgate/hatch; Universal/varies by install; Other
sl-SI: Mesto namestitve kamere (zunanjost vozila): Spredaj (maska/odbijač); Spredaj + zadaj (komplet 2 kamer); Spredaj + zadaj + ob straneh (komplet 4 kamer); Zadaj (registrska tablica/odbijač); Na strehi/pogled navzdol; Ob strani (levo); Ob strani (desno); Stranska ogledala (par); Prtljažna vrata; Univerzalno/odvisno od namestitve; Drugo
da: Kameramonteringsplacering (køretøjets ydre): For (kølergitter/kofanger); For og bag (sæt med 2 kameraer); For, bag og sider (sæt med 4 kameraer); Bag (nummerplade/kofanger); Tag/topmontering; Side (venstre); Side (højre); Sidespejle (par); Bagklap; Universal/afhænger af installation; Andet
ko: 카메라 장착 위치(차량 외부): 전면(그릴/범퍼); 전면 + 후면(2 카메라 키트); 전면 + 후면 + 측면(4 카메라 키트); 후면(번호판/범퍼); 루프/탑다운 마운트; 측면(왼쪽); 측면(오른쪽); 사이드 미러(쌍); 테일게이트/해치; 유니버설/설치에 따라 다름; 기타
nb: Kameramontering (utvendig kjøretøy): Foran (grill/støtfanger); Foran + bak (2-kamerasett); Foran + bak + sider (4-kamerasett); Bak (skilt/støtfanger); Tak-/toppmontering; Side (venstre); Side (høyre); Sidespeil (par); Bakluke/koffertlokk; Universell/varierer etter montering; Annet
th: ตำแหน่งที่ติดตั้งกล้อง (ภายนอกยานยนต์): ด้านหน้า (กระจังหน้า/กันชน); หน้า + หลัง (ชุดกล้อง 2 ตัว); หน้า + หลัง + ด้านข้าง (ชุดกล้อง 4 ตัว); ด้านหลัง (ป้ายทะเบียน/กันชน); หลังคา/ยึดมุมกดลง; ด้านข้าง (ซ้าย); ด้านข้าง (ขวา); กระจกมองข้าง (คู่); ประตูท้าย/กระโปรงหลัง; อเนกประสงค์/ขึ้นอยู่กับการติดตั้ง; อื่นๆ
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt camera (bên ngoài xe): Phía trước (lưới tản nhiệt/cản); Trước + sau (bộ 2 camera); Trước + sau + hông (bộ 4 camera); Phía sau (biển số/cản); Lắp trên nóc/hướng xuống; Bên hông (trái); Bên hông (phải); Gương chiếu hậu bên hông (cặp); Cửa sau/cốp xe; Phổ thông/tùy thuộc vào cách lắp; Khác
ro-RO: Locație de montare a camerei (exterior vehicul): Față (grilă/bară de protecție); Față + spate (kit cu 2 camere); Față + spate + laterale (kit cu 4 camere); Spate (plăcuță de înmatriculare/bară de protecție); Montare pe plafon/de sus în jos; Lateral (stânga); Lateral (dreapta); Oglinzi laterale (pereche); Haion/ușă spate; Universală/diferă în funcție de instalare; Altele
hr-HR: Mjesto za postavljanje kamere (vanjska strana vozila): Sprijeda (rešetka/branik); Sprijeda + straga (komplet od 2 kamere); Sprijeda + straga + bočno (komplet od 4 kamere); Straga (registarska pločica / branik); Krovni nosač / nosač odozgo prema dolje; Bočno (lijevo); Bočno (desno); Bočni retrovizori (par); Vrata prtljažnika; Univerzalno / ovisi o instalaciji; Ostalo
pt-BR: Local de montagem da câmera (exterior do veículo): Dianteira (grade/para-choque); Dianteira + traseira (kit com 2 câmeras); Dianteira + traseira + laterais (kit com 4 câmeras); Traseira (placa de carro/para-choque); Teto/visão de cima; Lateral (esquerda); Lateral (direita); Espelhos retrovisores (par); Porta traseira/porta-malas; Universal/varia conforme a instalação; Outro
cs: Místo montáže kamery (exteriér vozidla): Přední (mřížka/nárazník); Přední + zadní (sada 2 kamer); Přední + zadní + boční (sada 4 kamer); Zadní (SPZ/nárazník); Na střechu / shora dolů; Boční (levá); Boční (pravá); Zpětná zrcátka (pár); Zadní dveře; Univerzální / podle instalace; Jiné
fi: Kameran asennuspaikka (ajoneuvon ulkopuoli): Etuosa (säleikkö/puskuri); Etuosa + takaosa (2 kameran sarja); Etuosa + takaosa + sivut (4 kameran sarja); Takaosa (rekisterikilpi/puskuri); Katto/yläkiinnitys; Sivu (vasen); Sivu (oikea); Sivupeilit (pari); Takaluukku; Universaali / vaihtelee asennuksen mukaan; Muu
tr: Kamera montaj konumu (araç dışı): Ön (ızgara/tampon); Ön + arka (2 kameralı kit); Ön + arka + yanlar (4 kameralı kit); Arka (plaka/tampon); Tavan/yukarıdan montaj; Yan (sol); Yan (sağ); Yan aynalar (çift); Bagaj kapağı/arka kapı; Evrensel/kuruluma göre değişir; Diğer
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης κάμερας (εξωτερικό οχήματος): Εμπρός (μάσκα/προφυλακτήρας); Εμπρός + πίσω (κιτ 2 καμερών); Εμπρός + πίσω + πλάγια (κιτ 4 καμερών); Πίσω (πινακίδα/προφυλακτήρας); Βάση οροφής/εναέριας λήψης; Πλάι (αριστερά); Πλάι (δεξιά); Πλαϊνοί καθρέπτες (ζεύγος); Πόρτα χώρου αποσκευών; Γενικής χρήσης/διαφέρει ανά εγκατάσταση; Άλλο
fr: Emplacement de montage de la caméra à l’extérieur du véhicule: Avant (calandre/pare-chocs); Avant + arrière (kit 2 caméras); Avant + arrière + côtés (kit 4 caméras); Arrière (plaque d’immatriculation/pare-chocs); Toit/montage de haut en bas; Côté (gauche); Côté (droit); Rétroviseurs extérieurs (paire); Hayon/coffre; Universel/varie selon l’installation; Autre
bg-BG: Място за монтиране на камерата (външна част на превозното средство): Отпред (решетка/броня); Отпред + отзад (комплект от 2 камери); Отпред + отзад + отстрани (комплект от 4 камери); Отзад (регистрационен номер/броня); Покрив/монтаж отгоре надолу; Отстрани (ляво); Отстрани (дясно); Странични огледала (чифт); Врата на багажника/капак; Универсално/варира според монтажа; Други
es: Ubicación de montaje de la cámara (exterior del vehículo): Delantera (parrilla/parachoques); Delantera + trasera (kit de 2 cámaras); Delantera + trasera + laterales (kit de 4 cámaras); Trasera (matrícula/parachoques); Techo/montaje cenital; Lateral (izquierda); Lateral (derecha); Espejos laterales (par); Portón trasero/escotilla; Universal/varía según la instalación; Otro